District of Columbia statutes.
2-357.05

Authority to require bonds.

Pursuant to rules promulgated under this chapter, the CPO may require a bond for any solicitation if the CPO determines that it would be in the best interests of the District.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 705, 58 DCR 1185